test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-atoskahew_gt-norm.yaml
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: [ê-atoskahak, êhatoskahak] # SET I
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: [ê-atoskahat, êhatoskahat]
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: [ê-atoskahâyâhk, êhatoskahâyâhk]
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: [ê-atoskahâyahk, êhatoskahâyahk]
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: [ê-atoskahâyêk, êhatoskahâyêk]
	 
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: [ê-atoskahakik, êhatoskahakik] # SET I-Pl
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: [ê-atoskahacik, êhatoskahacik]
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: [ê-atoskahâyâhkik, êhatoskahâyâhkik]
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: [ê-atoskahâyahkok, êhatoskahâyahkok]
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: [ê-atoskahâyêkok, êhatoskahâyêkok] 
     
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: [ê-atoskahiyan, êhatoskahiyan] # SET II
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [ê-atoskahiyâhk, êhatoskahiyâhk]
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: [ê-atoskahiyêk, êhatoskahiyêk]    
     
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ê-atoskahât, êhatoskahât] # SET III
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-atoskahâcik, êhatoskahâcik]
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [ê-atoskahimât, êhatoskahimât]
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ê-atoskahimâcik, êhatoskahimâcik]
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ê-atoskahâyit, êhatoskahâyit]
	 				
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ê-atoskahimak, êhatoskahimak] # SET IV
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ê-atoskahimat, êhatoskahimat]
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-atoskahimâyâhk, êhatoskahimâyâhk]
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-atoskahimâyahk, êhatoskahimâyahk]
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-atoskahimâyek, êhatoskahimâyek]
     
     
     
     
     			
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: [ê-atoskahit, êhatoskahit] # SET I inv
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: [ê-atoskahisk, êhatoskahisk]
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyâhk, êhatoskahikoyâhk]
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyahk, êhatoskahikoyahk]
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyek, êhatoskahikoyek]
	 				
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: [ê-atoskahicik, êhatoskahicik] # SET I-Pl inv
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: [ê-atoskahiskik, êhatoskahiskik]
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyâhkik, êhatoskahikoyâhkik]
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyahkok, êhatoskahikoyahkok]
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyêkok, êhatoskahikoyêkok]
	 				
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: [ê-atoskahitân, êhatoskahitân] # SET II inv
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: [ê-atoskahitâhk, êhatoskahitâhk]
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: [ê-atoskahitakok, êhatoskahitakok]
	 				
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [ê-atoskahikot, êhatoskahikot] # SET III inv
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: [ê-atoskahikocik, êhatoskahikocik]
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyit, êhatoskahikoyit]
          			
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: [ê-atoskahiyit, êhatoskahiyit] # SET IV inv
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: [ê-atoskahiyisk, êhatoskahiyisk]
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyâhk, êhatoskahikoyâhk, ê-atoskahikowâyâhk, êhatoskahikowâyâhk]
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyêk, êhatoskahikoyêk, ê-atoskahikowâyêk, êhatoskahikowâyêk]
     PV/e+atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyahk, êhatoskahikoyahk, ê-atoskahikowâyahk, êhatoskahikowâyahk]
     
          atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: [atoskahak, atoskahak] # SET I
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: [atoskahat, atoskahat]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: [atoskahâyâhk, atoskahâyâhk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: [atoskahâyahk, atoskahâyahk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: [atoskahâyêk, atoskahâyêk]

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: [atoskahakik, atoskahakik] # SET I-Pl
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: [atoskahacik, atoskahacik]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: [atoskahâyâhkik, atoskahâyâhkik]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: [atoskahâyahkok, atoskahâyahkok]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: [atoskahâyêkok, atoskahâyêkok] 
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: [atoskahiyan, atoskahiyan] # SET II
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [atoskahiyâhk, atoskahiyâhk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: [atoskahiyêk, atoskahiyêk]    
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [atoskahât, atoskahât] # SET III
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [atoskahâcik, atoskahâcik]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [atoskahimât, atoskahimât]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [atoskahimâcik, atoskahimâcik]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [atoskahâyit, atoskahâyit]
					
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [atoskahimak, atoskahimak] # SET IV
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [atoskahimat, atoskahimat]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [atoskahimâyâhk, atoskahimâyâhk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [atoskahimâyahk, atoskahimâyahk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [atoskahimâyek, atoskahimâyek]
     			
     			
     			
     			
     			
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: [atoskahit, atoskahit] # SET I inv
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: [atoskahisk, atoskahisk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: [atoskahikoyâhk, atoskahikoyâhk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: [atoskahikoyahk, atoskahikoyahk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: [atoskahikoyek, atoskahikoyek]
					
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: [atoskahicik, atoskahicik] # SET I-Pl inv
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: [atoskahiskik, atoskahiskik]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: [atoskahikoyâhkik, atoskahikoyâhkik]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: [atoskahikoyahkok, atoskahikoyahkok]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: [atoskahikoyêkok, atoskahikoyêkok]
					
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: [atoskahitân, atoskahitân] # SET II inv
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: [atoskahitâhk, atoskahitâhk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: [atoskahitakok, atoskahitakok]
					
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [atoskahikot, atoskahikot] # SET III inv
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: [atoskahikocik, atoskahikocik]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: [atoskahikoyit, atoskahikoyit]
          			
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: [atoskahiyit, atoskahiyit] # SET IV inv
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: [atoskahiyisk, atoskahiyisk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: [atoskahikoyâhk, atoskahikoyâhk, atoskahikowâyâhk, atoskahikowâyâhk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: [atoskahikoyêk, atoskahikoyêk, atoskahikowâyêk, atoskahikowâyêk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: [atoskahikoyahk, atoskahikoyahk, atoskahikowâyahk, atoskahikowâyahk]
     
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+1Sg+3SgO: [niwî-wîci-atoskahimâw, niwîwîciatoskahimâw] # SET I (past)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Sg+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-atoskahimâw, kiwîwîciatoskahimâw]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+1Pl+3SgO: [niwî-wîci-atoskahimânân, niwîwîciatoskahimânân]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+12Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-atoskahimânaw, kiwîwîciatoskahimânaw]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-atoskahimâwâw, kiwîwîciatoskahimâwâw]
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+1Sg+3PlO: [niwî-wîci-atoskahimâwak, niwîwîciatoskahimâwak] # SET I-Pl (past)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Sg+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-atoskahimâwak, kiwîwîciatoskahimâwak]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+1Pl+3PlO: [niwî-wîci-atoskahimânânak, niwîwîciatoskahimânânak]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+12Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-atoskahimânawak, kiwîwîciatoskahimânawak]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-atoskahimâwâwak, kiwîwîciatoskahimâwâwak]
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Sg+1SgO: [kiwî-wîci-atoskahimin, kiwîwîciatoskahimin] # SET II (past)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [kiwî-wîci-atoskahiminân, kiwîwîciatoskahiminân]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Pl+1SgO: [kiwî-wîci-atoskahiminâwâw, kiwîwîciatoskahiminâwâw]
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-atoskahimêw, wîwîciatoskahimêw] # SET III (past)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-atoskahimêwak, wîwîciatoskahimêwak]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-atoskahimêyiwa, wîwîciatoskahimêyiwa]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-atoskahimimêw, wîwîciatoskahimimêw] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-atoskahimimêwak, wîwîciatoskahimimêwak] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-wîci-atoskahimimâwa, niwîwîciatoskahimimâwa] # SET IV (past)
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-atoskahimimâwa, kiwîwîciatoskahimimâwa]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-wîci-atoskahimimânâna, niwîwîciatoskahimimânâna]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-atoskahimimânawa, kiwîwîciatoskahimimânawa]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-atoskahimimâwâwa, kiwîwîciatoskahimimâwâwa]



     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: atoskah
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3SgO: atoskahâtân
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO: atoskahihk
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO: atoskahik
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3PlO: atoskahâtânik
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO: atoskahihkok

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO: atoskahâhkan
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO: atoskahâhkahk
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO: atoskahâhkêk
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO: atoskahâhkanik
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO: atoskahâhkahkok
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO: atoskahâhkêkok

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO: atoskahin
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1PlO: atoskahinân
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1SgO: atoskahik
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1SgO: atoskahîhkan
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1PlO: atoskahîhkâhk
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1SgO: atoskahîhkêk
     
     
     
     

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3SgO: atoskahaki # 1 and 2-3Sg
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3SgO: atoskahaci
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3SgO: atoskahâyâhki
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3SgO: [atoskahâyahko, atoskahâyahki]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3SgO: atoskahâyêko

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: atoskahâci # 3-4, 4-5
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: atoskahâtwâwi
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: atoskahâyici
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3PlO: atoskahakwâwi # 1 and 2-3Pl
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3PlO: atoskahatwâwi
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3PlO: atoskahâyâhkwâwi
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3PlO: atoskahâyahkwâwi
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3PlO: atoskahâyêkwâwi
